Hawaii statutes.
§342G‑12.5 Recycling
coordinator. There is established a position of assistant to the
coordinator of the office of solid waste management to be known as the
recycling coordinator. The position may be appointed by the director in
accordance with chapter 76. [L 1995, c 229, §2; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L
2005, c 226, §8; am L 2006, c 300, §9]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next